Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-106
Veterans; burial expenses; payment.

The expenses of burial under section 80-104 shall be paid by the county in which such veteran maintained his or her legal residence at time of death. The county board of such county is authorized and directed to audit the account and pay the expenses in similar manner as other accounts against such county are audited and paid.

Laws 1885, c. 39, § 3, p. 215;

R.S.1913, § 7160;

C.S.1922, § 6806;

C.S.1929, § 80-109;

R.S.1943, § 80-106;

Laws 1969, c. 752, § 4, p. 2832;

Laws 2005, LB 54, § 24.